Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.4955] PROVIDING MATERIAL SUPPORT OR RESOURCES FOR TERRORISM OR TO TERRORIST ORGANIZATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Designated foreign terrorist organization" means an organization designated as a terrorist organization by the United States Secretary of State pursuant to United States Code, title 8, section 1189. new text end new text begin (c) "Material support or resources" means any property, tangible or intangible, or service, including currency or monetary instruments or financial securities, financial services, lodging, training, expert advice or assistance, safe houses, false documentation or identification, communications equipment, facilities, weapons, lethal substances, explosives, personnel, or transportation. Material support or resources does not include medicine or religious materials. new text end new text begin (d) "Terrorism" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 22, section 2656f, paragraph (d), clause (2). new text end new text begin (e) "Terrorist activity" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 8, section 1182, paragraph (a), clause (3), subpart (B), item (iii). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Providing material support or resources prohibited. new text end new text begin A person who provides material support or resources to an organization knowing that the organization is a designated foreign terrorist organization or that the organization has engaged in terrorist activity or terrorism is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates subdivision 2 may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 2 may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 20 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $30,000, or both, if the violation is a substantial factor in the victim suffering great bodily harm. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates subdivision 2 may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 40 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $100,000, or both, if the violation is a substantial factor in causing the death of a human being. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end